Hawaii statutes.
[§23-73] Review for 2019 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions, exclusions, and credits under
the general excise tax listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2019 and
every tenth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular
session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 237-16.5--Gross income of real property
lessees from sublessees;

(2) Section 237-16.8--Value or gross income of
nonprofit organizations from conventions, conferences, trade shows, and display
spaces;

(3) Section 349-10--Proceeds earned from annual
senior citizen's fairs;

(4) Section 237-23.5--Amounts received from common
payments of related entities;

(5) Section 237-24(13)--Amounts received by blind,
deaf, or totally disabled persons from their business;

(6) Section 237-24(14)--Amounts received by
independent cane farmers who are sugarcane producers;

(7) Section 237-24(15)--Amounts received by foster
parents;

(8) Section 237-24(16)--Reimbursements to cooperative
housing corporations for operating and maintenance expenses;

(9) Section 237-24(17)--Amounts received by TRICARE managed
care support contractors; and

(10) Section 237-24(18)--Amounts received by
Patient-Centered Community Care program contractors. [L 2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next